Washington statutes.
RCW 18.73.020

Supersession of local regulation.

The legislature further declares its intention to supersede all ordinances, regulations, and requirements promulgated by counties, cities and other political subdivisions of the state of Washington, insofar as they may provide for the regulation of emergency medical care, first aid, and ambulance services which do not exceed the provisions of this chapter; except that (1) license fees established in this chapter shall supersede all license fees of counties, cities and other political subdivisions of this state; and, (2) nothing in this chapter shall alter the provisions of RCW 18.71.200, 18.71.210, and 18.71.220.

[ 1986 c 259 s 118; 1973 1st ex.s. c 208 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.